Utah statutes.
10-3-801.   Administrative powers in cities of the first class.

The executive and administrative powers, authority and duties in cities of the first class shall be divided into and among five departments as follows:

(1)  Department of Public Affairs and Finance;

(2)  Department of Water Supply and Waterworks;

(3)  Department of Public Safety;

(4)  Department of Streets and Public Improvements; and

(5)  Department of Parks and Public Property.

